Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB441.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of amending the Constitution of Kentucky by
adding a new section to establish that a person shall not be eligible to be elected or serve
in certain state and local offices unless he or she is a citizen of the United States, and has
not been a citizen or national of any country other than the United States, at the time of
election or appointment and for the immediately preceding eighteen (18) years, as stated
below?
SECTION 2. IT IS PROPOSED THAT A NEW SECTION BE ADDED TO
THE CONSTITUTION OF KENTUCKY TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In addition to the requirements of Sections 32, 72, 91, 92, 100, and 122, and any
other Section of this Constitution, a person shall not be eligible to be elected or
appointed to any elected office of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, including but not
limited to the offices of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of
State, Auditor of Public Accounts, Treasurer, Commissioner of Agriculture, member of
the General Assembly, justice or judge of any court of the Court of Justice, county
officer, or any other statewide, judicial, legislative, or local elected office established
under this Constitution or by law, unless that person, both at the time of election or
appointment and for the duration of his or her term of office:
1. Is a citizen of the United States;
2. Has been a citizen of the United States for at least eighteen (18) years
immediately preceding the election or appointment; and
3. Is not, and has not been for the eighteen (18) years immediately preceding
his or her election or appointment, a citizen or national of any foreign state or country.
This section shall not apply to offices of the United States government.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/20/2026 11:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1332
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act and the
entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section
2 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation
published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the
same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their
acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, not
later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August preceding the next
regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be chosen in a year in
which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the United States, or not
later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September preceding a regular election
in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice President of the United
States, the Secretary of State shall certify the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this
Act and the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky
contained in Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk
shall have the entirety of the text and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on the
ballots provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting
machines in use in each county or precinct.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/20/2026 11:22 AM Jacketed